src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_LÖPERÖ
!!  And the trisyllabic ö stem is classified {{@LEXNAME@}}.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 2 ö
!!€  löperö: löperö+A+Sg+Nom # sloppy
!!€  löperöjen: löperö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  löperöiden: löperö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  löperöitten: löperö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  löperömpi: löperö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  löperöin: löperö+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Unchanging long vowel stems
!!  The words with stem vowels o, u, y and ö preceded by vowels still have no
!!  stem variation, but use yet another pattern of allomorphs for
!!  singular and plural partitives and plural genitive

LEXICON ADJ_AUTIO
!!  The class for o final long vowel stems is {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old
!!  old dictionaries used ³. 
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 3 o
!!€  autio: autio+A+Sg+Nom # deserted
!!€  autiota: autio+A+Sg+Par
!!$  autioa: autio+A+Sg+Par
!!€  autioita: autio+A+Pl+Par
!!€  autioiden: autio+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  autioitten: autio+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  autiompi: autio+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  autioin: autio+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_RIIVIÖ
!!  The front voweled stems with ö after vowels go to class {{@LEXNAME@}},
!!  and used the old dictionary class ³.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 3 ö
!!€  riiviö: riiviö+A+Sg+Nom # nasty
!!€  riiviötä: riiviö+A+Sg+Par
!!€  riiviöiden: riiviö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  riiviöitten: riiviö+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  riiviömpi: riiviö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  riiviöin: riiviö+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no examples of new loan word adjectives ending in long vowel
!!  Furthermore there are no examples of adjectives in other classes without
!!  stem variation yet. There are some examples of these in nouns if you need
!!  new classes at some point.

!!  The abovementioned o, u, y and ö stems as well as new e stems can all
!!  form combinations with gradation feature as well. Not all combinations are
!!  yet found for adjectives, for full reference, read the noun classes.

LEXICON ADJ_KOLKKO
!!  The quantitative k gradations with o bisyllabic o stem use class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~0 o
!!€  kolkko: kolkko+A+Sg+Nom # gloomy
!!€  kolkossa: kolkko+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kolkoista: kolkko+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  kolkkoihin: kolkko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  kolkompi: kolkko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  kolkoin: kolkko+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_VIRKKU
!!  The quantitative k gradations with u bisyllabic o stem use class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~0 u
!!€  virkku: virkku+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  virkussa: virkku+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  virkuista: virkku+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  virkkuihin: virkku+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  virkumpi: virkku+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  virkuin: virkku+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ku  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_SÄIKKY
!!  The quantitative k gradations with y bisyllabic o stem use class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~0 y
!!€  säikky: säikky+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  säikyssä: säikky+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  säikyistä: säikky+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  säikkyihin: säikky+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  säikympi: säikky+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  säikyin: säikky+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ky  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:y  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_KÖKKÖ
!!  The quantitative k gradations with o bisyllabic ö stem use class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, and old dictionaries use classes ¹⁻A and ¹⁻D.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~0 ö
!!€  kökkö: kökkö+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  kökössä: kökkö+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kököistä: kökkö+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  kökköihin: kökkö+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  kökömpi: kökkö+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  kököin: kökkö+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  there is no unvarying e final adjective with _k ~ 0_ gradation.

LEXICON ADJ_SUIPPO
!!  The quantitative gradation of p before o is in class {{@LEXNAME@}} and
!!  old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 p~0 o
!!€  suippo: suippo+A+Sg+Nom # ?
!!€  suipossa: suippo+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  suipoista: suippo+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  suippoihin: suippo+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  suipompi: suippo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  suipoin: suippo+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:po  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:po  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_IKÄLOPPU
!!  The quantitative gradation of p before u is in class {{@LEXNAME@}} and
!!  old dictionaries would use ¹⁻B.
!!  It is only a nominal compound based adjective that ends in u and has
!!  p ~ 0 gradation here:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 p~0 u
!!€  ikäloppu: ikäloppu+A+Sg+Nom # age-old
!!€  ikälopussa: ikäloppu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  ikälopuista: ikäloppu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  ikäloppuihin: ikäloppu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  ikälopumpi: ikäloppu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  ikälopuin: ikäloppu+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:pu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  and none of the adjectives end in y and quantitative p gradation.

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
autio+A:autio  ADJ_AUTIO  ;
heikko+A:heik  ADJ_KOLKKO  ;
heittiö+A:heittiö  ADJ_RIIVIÖ  ;
helppo+A:help  ADJ_SUIPPO  ;
hulttio+A:hulttio  ADJ_AUTIO  ;
hylky+A:hyl  ADJ_SÄIKKY  ;
höperö+A:höperö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
ikäloppu+A:ikälop  ADJ_IKÄLOPPU  ;
ikäloppu+A:ikä#lop  ADJ_IKÄLOPPU  ;
ikäloppu+A:ikälop  ADJ_IKÄLOPPU  ;
juoppo+A:juop  ADJ_SUIPPO  ;
järkky+A:järk  ADJ_SÄIKKY  ;
kenkku+A:kenk  ADJ_VIRKKU  ;
kolkko+A:kolk  ADJ_KOLKKO  ;
kökkö+A:kök  ADJ_KÖKKÖ  ;
kömpelö+A:kömpelö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
köykky+A:köyk  ADJ_SÄIKKY  ;
loppu+A:lop  ADJ_IKÄLOPPU  ;
löperö+A:löperö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
mainio+A:mainio  ADJ_AUTIO  ;
nilkku+A:nilk  ADJ_VIRKKU  ;
nykerö+A:nykerö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
nöpelö+A:nöpelö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
papurikko+A:papurik  ADJ_KOLKKO  ;
papurikko+A:papu#rik  ADJ_KOLKKO  ;
pelko+A:pel  ADJ_KOLKKO  ;
pökkelö+A:pökkelö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
riiviö+A:riiviö  ADJ_RIIVIÖ  ;
röttelö+A:röttelö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
sokko+A:sok  ADJ_KOLKKO  ;
suippo+A:suip  ADJ_SUIPPO  ;
suukko+A:suuk  ADJ_KOLKKO  ;
säikky+A:säik  ADJ_SÄIKKY  ;
tökerö+A:tökerö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
tönkkö+A:tönk  ADJ_KÖKKÖ  ;
uskalikko+A:uskalik  ADJ_KOLKKO  ;
vakio+A:vakio  ADJ_AUTIO  ;
valio+A:valio  ADJ_AUTIO  ;
vanhuudenhöperö+A:vanhuudenhöperö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
vanhuudenhöperö+A:vanhuuden#höperö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
vanhuudenhöperö+A:vanhuudenhöperö  ADJ_LÖPERÖ  ;
virkku+A:virk  ADJ_VIRKKU  ;
